Washington statutes.
RCW 35.07.090

Effect of disincorporation—Powers—Officers.

Upon disincorporation of a city or town, its powers and privileges as such, are surrendered to the state and it is absolved from any further duty to the state or its own inhabitants and all the offices appertaining thereto shall cease to exist immediately upon the entry of the result: PROVIDED, That if a receiver is required, the officers shall continue in the exercise of all their powers until a receiver has qualified as such, and thereupon shall surrender to him or her all property, money, vouchers, records and books of the city or town including those in any manner pertaining to its business.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2001; 1965 c 7 s 35.07.090. Prior: 1933 c 128 s 1, part; 1897 c 69 s 6, part; RRS s 8919, part.]